Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.090

Initial or renewal credentials—Issuance and denial.

The commission shall issue an initial credential or renewal credential to an applicant who has met the requirements for a credential or deny an initial credential or renewal credential based upon failure to meet the requirements for a credential or unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 2007 c 269 s 8.]